Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

Cooperative Planning Agreements

54-18-101. Cooperative planning agreements authorized.

The department of transportation, with the cooperation of the department of economic and community development, and counties, cities and towns of the state, with the cooperation of their respective planning commissions, are authorized to enter into cooperative planning agreements that provide for a continuing and comprehensive transportation planning process.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 130, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-2101; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Code Commission Notes.

The state planning office, formerly referred to in this section, was changed to the department of economic and community development by the code commission in 2008.

Cross-References. Plans for street and highway systems, title 54, ch. 18, part 2.

Regional planning commission platting authority — Standardizing lots — Recording plat by county register, § 13-3-402.

Submission of subdivision plats to commission for approval — Filing and recording, § 13-4-302.

Comparative Legislation. Highway planning:

Ala. Code § 23-1-34.

Ark. Code § 27-66-301 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-6-150 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 100.287.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-7-105.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 227.030 et seq.

Collateral References. Highways
97.1- et seq.

54-18-102. Organizational framework included in agreement.

Cooperative agreements shall include an organizational framework for carrying out the planning process in a manner that ensures that decisions are reflective of, and responsive to, both the programs of the department of transportation and the needs and desires of the local governments.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 130, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-2102; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-18-103. Scope of agreements.

Planning may include, but shall not be limited to:

The collection, analysis, and interpretation of pertinent data concerning transportation facilities, travel patterns, land use, economic activity, (population and employment), financial resources, and existing legislation;

The forecasting of future development and of future travel demands;

The establishment of transportation objectives and standards;

The development and evaluation of transportation plans through an appraisal of practicable alternatives;

The preparation and dissemination of pertinent information needed by official agencies in their considerations leading to the adoption of plans and necessary for realistic decisions by citizens with respect to their support of improvement programs; and

The preparation of recommendations concerning the scheduling of the improvements, coordination with other development programs, revision of ordinances and regulations, and additional legislation, if necessary.

Acts 1963, ch. 130, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-2103.

54-18-104. Purpose of part.

It is the intent of this part to fit transportation planning with comprehensive local planning and state highway planning into a coordinated whole, and that the state agencies and local governments involved are to be authorized to do everything necessary and proper to achieve that end, including arrangements for keeping the coordinated planning current and periodic reappraisals of transportation plans.

Acts 1963, ch. 130, § 4; T.C.A., § 54-2104.